Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 10.3. Underground Utility Damage Prevention Act.
§ 56-265.22:1.
Meetings between excavators and operators.

Any person planning excavation or demolition in such proximity to the underground utility lines that the utility lines may be destroyed, damaged, dislocated, or disturbed may request a meeting with the operator whose underground utility lines are located
in the area of the proposed excavation or demolition to discuss the marking of such lines. The project requiring excavation shall be of sufficient complexity to require a pre-marking meeting. The meeting notice shall include all
information required by § 56-265.18 and a specific time and location for the meeting.

The notification center shall, upon receiving a meeting notice, notify all member operators whose underground utility lines are located in the area of the proposed excavation or demolition. The notification center shall provide to the excavator the names
of those operators being notified of the meeting.

The operators notified by the notification center shall meet with the excavator by 7:00 a.m. on the third working day following the excavator’s meeting notice. If an operator does not agree to the excavator’s suggested time and location, the operator
shall set up a mutually agreeable time and location to meet no later than 7:00 a.m. on the third working day following the meeting notice.

The excavator’s meeting notice shall not be the notice to excavate required under § 56-265.17. The notice to excavate required under § 56-265.17 for the project shall not be submitted to the notification center until after the meeting referenced in subsection
A of this section has occurred, or after 7:00 a.m. on the third working day following the meeting notice.

History.
2002, c. 841.

§ 56-265.23.
Exemption for roadway maintenance operations by the Virginia Department of Transportation and certain counties, cities, and towns.

Employees of the Virginia Department of Transportation acting within the scope of their employment, and certain employees of those counties, cities, and towns which maintain their streets or roads in accordance with §

33.2-319

or §

33.2-366

performing street or roadway maintenance operations and acting within the scope of their employment, excavating entirely within the right-of-way of a public road, street or highway of the Commonwealth shall not be required
to comply with the provisions of this chapter if reasonable care is taken to protect the utility lines placed in the right-of-way by permit and if they:

Excavate within the limits of the original excavation; on the traveled way, shoulders or drainage features of a public road, street, or highway and any excavation does not exceed eighteen inches (0.45 meter) in depth below the grade existing prior to
such excavation; or

Are replacing previously existing structures in their previous locations.

History.
1979, c. 291; 1994, c. 890.

Editor’s note.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

The 1994 amendment,
effective January 1, 1995, rewrote this section.

§ 56-265.24.
Duties of excavator.

Any person excavating within two feet on either side of the staked or marked location of an operator’s underground utility line or demolishing in such proximity to an underground utility line that the utility line may be destroyed, damaged, dislocated
or disturbed shall take all reasonable steps necessary to properly protect, support and backfill underground utility lines. For excavations not parallel to an existing underground utility line, such steps shall include, but may
not be limited to:

Exposing the underground utility line to its extremities by hand digging;

Not utilizing mechanized equipment within two feet of the extremities of all exposed utility lines; and

Protecting the exposed utility lines from damage.In addition, for excavations parallel to an existing utility line, such steps shall include, but may not be limited to, hand digging at reasonable distances along the line of excavation. The excavator shall
exercise due care at all times to protect underground utility lines when exposing these lines by hand digging.

If the markings locating the underground lines become illegible due to time, weather, construction, or any other cause, the person performing the excavation or demolition shall so notify the notification center for the area. Such notification shall constitute
an extension under subsection D of § 56-265.17.

If, upon arrival at the site of a proposed excavation, the excavator observes clear evidence of the presence of an unmarked utility line in the area of the proposed excavation, the excavator shall not begin excavating until an additional call is made
to the notification center for the area pursuant to subsection B of § 56-265.17.

In the event of any damage to, or dislocation, or disturbance of any underground utility line including its appurtenances, covering, and coating, in connection with any excavation or demolition, the person responsible for the excavation or demolition
operations shall immediately notify the operator of the underground utility line and shall not backfill around the underground utility line until the operator has repaired the damage or has given clearance to backfill. The operator
shall either commence repair of the damage or give clearance to backfill within twenty-four hours, and upon his failure to commence or prosecute with diligence such repair or give clearance, the giving of clearance shall be presumed.

If the damage, dislocation, or disturbance of the underground utility line creates an emergency, the person responsible for the excavation or demolition shall, in addition to complying with subsection D of this section, take immediate steps reasonably
calculated to safeguard life, health and property.

With the exception of designers requesting marking of a site, in accordance with § 56-265.17, no person, including operators, shall request marking of a site through a notification center unless excavation shall commence within thirty working days from
the date of the original notification to the notification center. Except for counties, cities, and towns, any person who willfully fails to comply with this subsection shall be liable to the operator for three times the cost of
marking its utility line, not to exceed $1,000.

Any person performing excavation or demolition shall provide to the operator of the underground utility line in the area of excavation or to the appropriate regulatory authority having jurisdiction, the number issued by the notification center for that
excavation site in response to the excavator’s notice, within one hour of a request for the number issued by the notification center.

If an excavator discovers an unmarked line, the excavator shall protect this line pursuant to subsection C of this section. An excavator shall not remove an abandoned line without first receiving authorization to do so by the operator.

History.
1979, c. 291; 1994, c. 890; 1996, c. 79; 2002, c. 841.

The 1994 amendment,
effective January 1, 1995, deleted “by blasting” following “demolishing” in the first sentence in subsection A; added present subsections B and C; substituted former subsections B and C as present subsections D and E; and
in subsection E deleted “situations involving danger to life, health, or property” following “an emergency,” substituted “subsection D” for “subsection B,” and inserted “health” near the end.

The 1996 amendment,
effective March 5, 1996, added subsection F.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 841, in the introductory paragraph of subsection A, substituted “on either side” for “of either side” and “an underground utility line” for “the underground utility line” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence,
which read: “This protection shall include but may not be limited to hand digging, within the limits of the planned excavation or demolition, starting two feet of either side of the extremities of the underground utility line for other
than parallel type excavations and at reasonable distances along the line of excavation for parallel type excavations,” and added “For excavations not parallel to an existing underground utility line, such steps shall include, but
may not be limited to” at the end thereof; added subdivisions A 1 through A 3 and the concluding paragraph of subsection A: in the first sentence in subsection F, added “With the exception of designers requesting marking of a site,
in accordance with § 56-265.17” at the beginning and substituted “shall commence within thirty working days from the date of the original notification to the notification center” for “is scheduled to commence; nor make repeated requests
for remarking, unless the repeated request is due to circumstances not reasonably within the control of such person” at the end of that sentence; and added subsections G and H.

§ 56-265.25.
Liability of operator and excavator; penalties.

If any underground utility line is damaged as a proximate result of a person’s failure to comply with any provision of this chapter, that person shall be liable to the operator of the underground utility line for the total cost to repair the damaged facilities
as that cost is normally computed by the operator, provided the operator is a member of the notification center covering the area in which the damage to the utility line takes place. The liability of such a person for such
damage shall not be limited by reason of this chapter. A. 1. If any underground utility line is damaged as a proximate result of a person’s failure to comply with any provision of this chapter, that person shall be liable
to the operator of the underground utility line for the total cost to repair the damaged facilities as that cost is normally computed by the operator, provided the operator is a member of the notification center covering
the area in which the damage to the utility line takes place. The liability of such a person for such damage shall not be limited by reason of this chapter.

Any person who willfully fails to notify the notification center of proposed excavation or demolition shall be liable to the operator as provided in subsection A of § 56-265.17.

If, after receiving proper notice, an operator fails to discharge a duty imposed by any provision of this chapter and an underground utility line of such operator is damaged, as a proximate result of the operator’s failure to discharge such duty, by any
person who has complied with all of the provisions of this chapter, such person shall not be so liable.

If an underground utility line of an operator is damaged, as the proximate result of the operator’s failure to comply with any provision of this chapter, by any person who has complied with the provisions of this chapter, the operator shall be liable
to such person for the total cost to repair any damage to the equipment or facilities of such person resulting from such damage to the operator’s underground utility line.

Except as specifically set forth herein, the provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to either abrogate any rights, duties, or remedies existing under law or create any rights, duties, defenses, or remedies in addition to any rights, duties,
or remedies existing under law.

History.
1979, c. 291; 1980, c. 696; 1989, c. 448; 1994, c. 890.

The 1994 amendment,
effective January 1, 1995, in subdivision A 1, in the first sentence substituted “as a proximate result of a person’s failure” for “by any person who has failed,” substituted “this chapter” for “§§ 56-265.17, 56-265.18 and
56-265.20,” deleted the clause (i) and (ii) designations, and deleted “upon receiving proper notice in accordance with this chapter, has complied with the provisions of § 56-265.19” at the end, added present subdivision 2, redesignated
former subdivision 2 as present subdivision 3, in present subdivision 3 substituted “fails” for “shall fail,” and deleted “or” at the end; redesignated former subdivision 3 as present subsection B; in subsection B, inserted “as the
proximate result of the operator’s failure to comply with any provision of this chapter,” deleted “all” following “complied with,” and deleted “as the proximate result of the operator’s failure to comply with any provision of this
chapter” following “of this chapter”; and redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Illegality defense to injured excavator’s negligence claims. —

Where an excavator was injured by an underground power line, the excavator was not engaged in any illegal activity for which he faced punishment; therefore, the trial court rejected the utility company’s illegality defense to the excavator’s negligence
claims. Fulcher v. Va. Elec. & Power Co., 60 Va. Cir. 199, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 267 (Norfolk Oct. 9, 2002).

§ 56-265.26.
Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 890, effective January 1, 1995.

§ 56-265.26:1.
Utility line depth requirement.

Every operator having the right to install underground utility lines shall install such underground utility lines at depths required by accepted industry standards. Such standards shall include, as applicable, standards established by the National Electrical
Safety Code, Bellcore Blue Book-Manual of Construction Procedures, the Commission’s pipeline safety regulations, the Department of Health’s waterworks regulations, and the depth standards of the Virginia Cable Telecommunications Association,
which shall be established in consultation with the State Corporation Commission no later than July 1, 2002.

History.
2002, c. 841.

§ 56-265.27.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-265.27, pertaining to severability, derived from 1979, c. 291.

§ 56-265.28.
Sovereign immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abrogate the immunity from suit accruing to the Commonwealth, her political subdivisions, agencies, officers or employees, or the officers or employees of her political subdivisions and agencies, as exists
prior to July 1, 1980.

History.
1979, c. 291.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 35 Limitation of Actions: Statutes of Limitations; Immunities; Res Judicata and Collateral Estoppel. § 35.02 Immunities. Charles E. Friend.

§ 56-265.29.
Other similar laws.

Compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall not exempt any operator or person from the operation of any other applicable laws, ordinances, regulations, or rules of governmental and regulatory authorities having jurisdiction, unless exempted by
such other laws, ordinances, regulations, or rules as a result of such compliance.

History.
1979, c. 291.

§ 56-265.30.
Authority of the State Corporation Commission.

The Commission shall enforce the provisions of the Underground Utility Damage Prevention Act as set out in this chapter. The Commission may promulgate any rules or regulations necessary to implement the Commission’s authority to enforce this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the Commission to promulgate any rules or regulations pursuant to its authority to enforce this chapter that require any person, other than jurisdictional gas or hazardous liquid operators, to report
to the Commission any probable violation of this chapter or any incident involving damage, dislocation or disturbance of any utility line.

History.
1994, c. 890; 2001, c. 399.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 399 added the subsection A designator, and added subsection B.

§ 56-265.31.
Commission to establish advisory committee.

The Commission shall establish an advisory committee consisting of representatives of the following entities: Commission staff, utility operator, notification center, excavator, municipality, Virginia Department of Transportation, Board for Contractors,
and underground line locator. Persons appointed to the advisory committee by the Commission shall have expertise with the operation of the Underground Utility Damage Prevention Act. The advisory committee shall perform duties which
may be assigned by the Commission, including the review of reports of violations of the chapter, and make recommendations to the Commission.

The members of the advisory committee shall be immune, individually and jointly, from civil liability for any act or omission done or made in performance of their duties while serving as members of such advisory committee, but only in the absence of willful
misconduct.

History.
1994, c. 890; 1996, c. 79.

The 1996 amendment
effective March 5, 1996, inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

§ 56-265.32.
Commission to impose civil penalties for certain violations; establishment of Underground Utility Damage Prevention Special Fund.

The Commission may, by judgment entered after a hearing on notice duly served on any person not less than 30 days before the date of the hearing, impose a civil penalty not exceeding $2,500 for each violation, if it is proved that the person violated
any of the provisions of this chapter as a result of a failure to exercise reasonable care. Any proceeding or civil penalty undertaken pursuant to this section shall not prevent nor preempt the right of any party to obtain civil
damages for personal injury or property damage in private causes of action. This subsection shall not authorize the Commission to impose civil penalties on any county, city, town, or other political subdivision. However, the Commission
shall inform the counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions of reports of alleged violations involving the locality or political subdivision and, at the request of the locality or political subdivision, suggest corrective
action.

If the Commission asserts there is recurring noncompliance with any of the provisions of this chapter by a county, city, town, or other political subdivision, the Commission, upon written notice to the chairman of such operator’s board or, in the case
of a city or town, the mayor of such operator’s council, and to such operator’s chief executive officer, may require a written response by such person or his designee. Such response shall be made within 30 days of the operator’s
receipt of written notice from the Commission. The response shall confirm that the operator will comply promptly or explain why it disputes any assertion by the Commission of noncompliance. If the operator is not able to return
to compliance promptly, the operator shall describe its plan to achieve compliance in a corrective action plan to be submitted to the Commission no later than 60 days after the receipt of the written notice. Following submittal
of a corrective action plan, the Commission may convene a hearing for the purpose of receiving additional evidence, determining whether noncompliance has occurred, and determining further suggested corrective action. The Commission
may also convene such a hearing if the operator fails to provide a written response or a corrective action plan as required by this subsection, or provides a response that disputes the Commission’s assertions. Nothing in this section
shall limit the Commission’s powers under this chapter with respect to persons who are not counties, cities, towns, or political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

The Underground Utility Damage Prevention Special Fund (hereinafter referred to as Special Fund) is hereby established as a revolving fund to be used by the Commission for administering the regulatory program authorized by this chapter. The Special Fund
shall be composed entirely of funds generated by the enforcement of this chapter. Excess funds shall be used to support any one or more of the following: (i) public awareness programs established by a notification center pursuant
to subsection B of § 56-265.16:1; (ii) training and education programs for excavators, operators, line locators, and other persons; and (iii) programs providing incentives for excavators, operators, line locators, and other persons
to reduce the number and severity of violations of the Act. The Commission shall determine the appropriate allocation of any excess funds among such programs, and shall establish required elements for any program established under
clause (ii) or (iii).

All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Underground Utility Damage Prevention Special Fund. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the Special Fund. The Special Fund shall be established on the books
of the Commission comptroller and any funds remaining in the Underground Utility Damage Prevention Special Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain in the Special Fund.

History.
1994, c. 890; 2001, c. 351; 2002, c. 348; 2010, c. 205.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 205, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2011.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 351 divided former subsection B into present subsections B and C; and in subsection B, inserted “one or more of the following: (i)” and inserted the language beginning “(ii)” to the end of the paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 348, effective April 1, 2002, deleted “except § 56-265.16:1” following “provisions of this chapter” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 205, effective January 1, 2011, in subsection A, added “or other political subdivision” to the end of the third sentence, inserted “and other political subdivisions” and “or political subdivision” twice, made related changes,
and made a minor stylistic change; redesignated former subsections B and C as present subsections C and D, respectively; added present subsection B; and in subsection C, made a minor stylistic change.